Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-506 Choice of law as to
execution. A written will is valid if executed in compliance with section
560:2-502 or 560:2-503 or if its execution complies with the law at the time of
execution of the place where the will is executed, or of the law of the place
where at the time of execution or at the time of death the testator is
domiciled, has a place of abode, or is a national. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next